Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Interstate Bridges

280.140.
Consolidation of corporations operating toll bridges across boundary streams.

When a corporation heretofore or hereafter organized under the general incorporation laws of this state for the purpose of constructing, maintaining and operating a bridge across a river forming a boundary line of this state has, with the consent of its stockholders, heretofore consolidated, or may hereafter consolidate, with a corporation organized for the same purpose under the laws of any other state, the consolidated corporation shall, upon filing a verified copy of the agreement of consolidation with the Secretary of State, have the rights, powers, privileges and immunities of a corporation under the laws of this state, and shall become a corporation of this state, with the right of perpetual succession. The consolidated corporation shall have the power to construct, maintain and operate such a bridge, and the power to condemn land in this state necessary for the construction, operation and maintenance of the bridge and its avenues, approaches and necessary appurtenances, the proceedings to be conducted in the manner prescribed by law for the condemnation of lands for railroad purposes. No bridge constructed under this section, nor any main or principal approach thereof, shall cross any railway at grade thereof.

The consolidated corporation may increase its capital stock from time to time to an amount sufficient for the construction of the bridge, but not to exceed the amount of the capital stock authorized in the articles of incorporation of its Kentucky constituent corporation, and may create an indebtedness not exceeding the amount of its capital stock, and secure the indebtedness by a mortgage upon its property, franchises and rights.

The filing of a copy of the agreement of consolidation with the Secretary of State shall operate as an acceptance by the consolidated corporation of the provisions of the Constitution and of all the provisions of this section and of KRS

280.150

.

History.

843, 844, 853.

280.150.
Ownership or interest in more than one bridge forbidden.

No consolidated corporation of the type mentioned in KRS

280.140

shall at the same time own, possess, lease, control or operate more than one (1) bridge crossing any river forming a boundary line of this state. No person owning, possessing or controlling any bridge crossing a river forming a boundary line of this state, and no agent, officer or stockholder thereof, shall at the same time own, possess, lease or control any bridge constructed by a consolidated corporation of the type mentioned in KRS

280.140

. No such consolidated corporation, and no agent, officer or stockholder thereof, shall make or be a party to any contract, agreement, combination or arrangement relating to tolls or fares on any bridge crossing a river forming a boundary line of this state with any person owning, possessing, controlling or operating any other such bridge, or with any agent, officer or stockholder thereof. No stock in any such consolidated corporation shall be subscribed for by, transferred to, or held, possessed or owned by any other corporation owning, possessing, controlling or operating any other bridge crossing, from any point in the same county, a river forming a boundary line of this state, or by any agent, officer or stockholder of such a corporation. Each such consolidated corporation, and its agents, officers and stockholders, are hereby made incapable of and prohibited from holding, possessing or owning stock in any other corporation owning, possessing, controlling or operating any bridge crossing, from any point in the same county, a river forming a boundary line of this state.

Every contract, agreement, combination or arrangement made, and every act done, in violation of any provision of this section or of KRS

280.140

, shall be void.

History.

849, 851.

280.160.
Reorganization of insolvent companies operating bridges across boundary streams. [Repealed.]